pl: Typ paska kneeboardu: Regulowany pasek z klamrą; Podwójny pasek; Pasek na rzep; Pasek z grzechotką; Pojedynczy wyściełany pasek; Inny
it: Tipo di cinghia della ginocchiera: Cinghia regolabile con fibbia; Doppia cinghia; Cinghia a strappo; Cinghia a cricchetto; Cinghia singola imbottita; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de correia para kneeboard: Correia ajustável com fivela; Correia dupla; Tira aderente; Correia de catraca; Correia única acolchoada; Outro
lt-LT: Kneeboard diržo tipas: Reguliuojamas dirželis su sagtimi; Dvigubas dirželis; Kibiosios juostos dirželis; Fiksuojamasis diržas; Viengubas paminkštintas dirželis; Kita
nl: Kneeboard band type: Verstelbare gespband; Dubbele band; Klittenbandsluiting; Ratelband; Enkele gewatteerde band; Anders
th: ประเภทแผ่นรองเข่าแบบมีสายรัด: สายรัดหัวเข็มขัดปรับได้; สายรัดคู่; สายรัดแบบตีนตุ๊กแก; สายรัดแบบเฟืองวงล้อ; สายรัดเดี่ยวบุนุ่ม; อื่นๆ
da: Remtype for knæbræt: Justerbar spændestrop; Dobbelt strop; Strop med velcrolukning; Skraldestrop; Enkelt polstret strop; Andet
cs: Typ popruhu klekacího prkna: Nastavitelný popruh s přezkou; Dvojitý popruh; Popruh na suchý zip; Popruh s ráčnou; Jednoduchý polstrovaný popruh; Jiné
fr: Type de sangle de kneeboard: Sangle à boucle réglable; Double sangle; Sangle auto-agrippante; Sangle à cliquet; Sangle simple rembourrée; Autre
nb: Knebrettets stropptype: Justerbar stropp med spenne; Dobbel stropp; Borrelåsstropp; Skrallestropp; Enkel polstret stropp; Annet
sk-SK: Typ popruhu kolennej platne: Nastaviteľný popruh s prackou; Dvojitý popruh; Popruh na suchý zips; Račňový popruh; Jednoduchý polstrovaný popruh; Iné
ko: 니보드 스트랩 유형: 길이 조절식 버클 스트랩; 이중 스트랩; 후크 앤 루프 스트랩; 래칫 스트랩; 단일 패딩 스트랩; 기타
sv: Typ av knäremssystem: Justerbar rem med spänne; Dubbel rem; Kardborreband; Spännband; Enkel vadderad rem; Övrigt
de: Typ des Kneeboard-Gurts: Verstellbarer Riemen mit Schnalle; Doppelriemen; Klettverschluss-Riemen; Ratschengurt; Gepolsterter Einzelgurt; Sonstige
zh-TW: 滑水跪板綁帶類型: 可調式扣帶; 雙綁帶; 魔鬼氈綁帶; 棘輪綁帶; 單一加墊綁帶; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de alça do kneeboard: Tira com fivela ajustável; Tira dupla; Tira com fecho de contato; Tira com catraca; Tira acolchoada simples; Outra
tr: Kneeboard kayış tipi: Ayarlanabilir tokalı kayış; Çift kayış; Cırt cırtlı kayış; Cırcırlı kayış; Tekli dolgulu kayış; Diğer
el: Τύπος ιμάντα σανίδας Kneeboard: Ρυθμιζόμενος ιμάντας με αγκράφα; Διπλός ιμάντας; Ιμάντας χρατς (hook-and-loop); Ιμάντας καστάνιας; Μονός ιμάντας με επένδυση; Άλλο
zh-CN: 膝板绑带类型: 可调节插扣带; 双绑带; 魔术贴绑带; 棘轮绑带; 软垫单绑带; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta traku za desko za klečeče deskanje na vodi: Nastavljiv trak z zaponko; Dvojni trak; Trak na ježka; Napenjalni trak; Enojni oblazinjen trak; Drugo
ru: Тип креплений книборда: Регулируемый ремешок с пряжкой; Двойной ремешок; Ремешок на липучке; Ремешок с храповым механизмом; Одинарный мягкий ремешок; Другое
bg-BG: Тип каишка за наколенка: Регулируема каишка с катарама; Двойна каишка; Самозалепваща каишка; Каишка с тресчотка; Единична подплатена каишка; Друго
ro-RO: Tip curea pentru genunchieră: Chingă cu cataramă reglabilă; Chingă dublă; Chingă cu bandă autoadezivă; Chingă cu clichet; Chingă unică căptușită; Altele
es: Tipo de correa de la tabla de kneeboard: Correa de hebilla ajustable; Correa doble; Correa de gancho y bucle; Correa de trinquete; Correa acolchada simple; Otra
hu: Kneeboard hevedertípusa: Állítható csatos pánt; Dupla pánt; Tépőzáras pánt; Racsnis pánt; Szimpla párnázott pánt; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta remena za koljena: Prilagodljiva traka s kopčom; Dvostruka traka; Traka na čičak; Traka sa zatezačem; Jednostruka podstavljena traka; Ostalo
vi: Loại dây đeo ván trượt đầu gối: Dây đai có khóa điều chỉnh; Dây đai kép; Dây đai khóa dán; Dây đai có tăng đơ; Dây đai đơn có đệm; Khác
en: Kneeboard strap type: Adjustable buckle strap; Double strap; Hook-and-loop strap; Ratchet strap; Single padded strap; Other
ja: ニーボードストラップタイプ: 調整可能なバックルストラップ; ダブルストラップ; 面ファスナー式ストラップ; ラチェットストラップ; シングルパッド入りストラップ; その他
fi: Polvilaudan hihnan tyyppi: Säädettävä solkihihna; Kaksoishihna; Tarrahihna; Räikkähihna; Yksittäinen pehmustettu hihna; Muu